Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Chapter 14 Veterans
§ 19-14-109.
Veteran burial teams.

The veteran burial team account is created. Subject to policies and procedures adopted by the veterans’ commission, Wyoming veteran burial teams who have contracted with the commission may apply for payment for the performance of military funeral duties not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) per funeral. The commission shall also maintain a list of registered veteran burial teams and provide that list upon request.

Any claim made pursuant to this section shall be made to the veterans’ commission. The commission shall review and act upon all claims submitted under subsection (a) of this section no later than June 30 following the calendar year in which expenses were incurred for the claim submitted. If after deducting and paying the commission’s administrative expenses in processing claims there are insufficient funds within the veteran burial team account to pay all approved claims, the commission shall prorate reimbursement among all approved claims. Payments authorized through the commission pursuant to this section shall be paid by the state treasurer by warrant issued by the state auditor upon vouchers signed by the state veterans’ service officer or his designee.

As used in this section, “veteran burial team” means any group of veterans that the commission has contracted with, pursuant to policies and procedures, to perform military services within the state of Wyoming authorized by the commission during the burial of any decedent who has received any military discharge, other than a dishonorable discharge, from the armed forces of the United States.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 181, § 1; 2004, ch. 39, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 74, § 1; 2015 ch. 118, § 1, effective March 3, 2015.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a) and (c), substituted “policies and procedures” for “rules and regulations”; also in (a) substituted “payment for” for “reimbursement of any actual and necessary expenses incurred in”; and in (b) inserted “calendar” preceding “year,” “after deducting and paying the commission's administrative expenses in processing claims” preceding “there are insufficient funds,” and “within the veteran burial team account” preceeding “to pay all approved claims.”

Laws 2004, ch. 39, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” from the first sentence in (a).

The 2006 amendment,

Substituted “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 74, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” in the first sentence.

Laws 2015, ch. 118, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 39, § 2, provides:

“(a)

The policies and procedures adopted by the veterans' commission pursuant to this act shall not be subject to provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [W.S.

16-3-101

et seq.].

“(b)

The provisions of this act shall apply to claims payable under W.S.

19-14-109

for services rendered on or after July 1, 2003.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act”.

§ 19-14-110.
Description and declaration of Wyoming veterans' memorial museum.

The lands in Natrona county described as follows are hereby declared to be the Wyoming veterans’ memorial museum to be managed by the military department: a parcel of land situate in the NE1/4 of the SE1/4 and the SE1/4 of the NE1/4 of Section 20, Township 34 North, Range 80 West, 6th P.M., Natrona County, Wyoming, said parcel being more particularly described as follows: commencing at the southeast corner of said Section 20, monumented by a brass cap; thence N01°27´16"W, a distance of 2597.39 feet to the southeast corner of the parcel monumented by a nail and being the point of beginning; thence S43°17´47"W, a distance of 163.93 feet to the southwest corner of the parcel, monumented by a nail; thence N46°42´21"W, a distance of 359.92 feet to the northwest corner of the parcel, monumented by a nail; thence N43°17´47"E, a distance of 163.93 feet to the northeast corner of the parcel, monumented by a nail; thence S46°42´21"E, a distance of 359.92 feet to the point of beginning, containing 1.35 acres, more or less.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 63, § 1; 2011, ch. 27, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch. 27, §
2, renumbered this section, which was former §

19-7-107

.

Laws 2011, ch. 27, §
3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.

Legislative intent. —

Effective date.—

Laws 2008, ch. 63, §
4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

§ 19-14-111.
Employment; permissive preference in private employment.

A private employer may grant preference to a veteran in hiring and promotion.

A private employer may grant preference in hiring and promotion to a spouse of a disabled veteran and to a surviving spouse of a deceased veteran.

The granting of a preference based on a person’s status under subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall not be considered a discriminatory or unfair employment practice under local or state equal employment opportunity law, provided the granting of the preference is not based in any manner on consideration of a characteristic, attribute or category enumerated in state law as constituting a discriminatory or unfair employment practice.

As used in this section:

“Disabled veteran” means a veteran who has a compensable service connected permanent and total disability certified by the United States veterans administration or by the retirement board of one (1) of the several branches of the armed forces;

“Veteran” means a member of the military forces of the United States whose written evidence of separation from the military forces shows an honorable discharge or the rendition of honorable military service.

History.

2016 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016 ch. 107, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 11, 2016.

§ 19-14-112.
Description and declaration of Wyoming national guard museum.

The lands in Laramie county, Wyoming, described as follows are hereby declared to be the Wyoming national guard museum to be managed by the military department: All of Block 8, Replat of Airport Addition to the City of Cheyenne, Wyoming, as shown by the Replat of said Airport Addition on file and of record in the office of the County Clerk and Ex-Officio Register of Deeds, in and for said Laramie County, said replat being filed on October 1, 1935, as No. 287212; LESS the Southerly ten (10) feet of said Block 8, Replat of Airport Addition quitclaimed to the City of Cheyenne by the Wyoming Army National Guard, as filed June 15, 1995, in Book 1400, Page 461, in the records of said Clerk of Laramie County, Wyoming.

History.

2019 ch. 8, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.